Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 5, chapter 31, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  The Department of Land  Conservation and Development shall draft a report that sum-
marizes the department’s activities in carrying out sections 3  and 4 , chapter 31, Oregon Laws 2024
[of this  2024 Act ]. The department shall submit the report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation, administrative policy and budget, to  the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to marine renewable energy and coastal resources
no later than [ September 1, 2025 ] January 1, 2027 .
SECTION 2.  Section 6, chapter 31, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  Section 5 , chapter 31,  Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act,
[of this 2024 Act ] is repealed on January 2, [ 2026] 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3963 (HB 3963-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3963 (HB 3963-INTRO) Page 2